Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-159
Requisitions by using agency; procedures used by materiel division.

Each using agency shall, at the time, in the form, and for the periods prescribed by the materiel division, present to it detailed requisition for all personal property to be purchased or leased. The materiel division shall then arrange such schedules as are included in or covered by the requisition for purchase and contract and for advertising them in the manner best calculated to attract competition and advantageous price as set forth in sections 81-145 to 81-162 and 81-1118 to 81-1118.06. It shall prescribe the terms and conditions for delivery, inspections, and all other details thereof.

Laws 1943, c. 215, § 15, p. 708;

R.S.1943, § 81-159;

Laws 1963, c. 508, § 8, p. 1618;

Laws 1975, LB 359, § 7;

Laws 1981, LB 381, § 5;

Laws 1992, LB 1241, § 16;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 12.